Maryland, session 2026, HB1067.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
10–408.
(a) (1) In this section[, “handgun”] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “HANDGUN” means a firearm:
[(1)] (I) With a barrel length not exceeding 6 inches; and

HOUSE BILL 1067 3
[(2)] (II) That does not have a scope or an electronic device attached.
(3) “NONLEAD AMMUNITION” INCLUDES:
(I) AMMUNITION IN WHICH THERE IS LESS THAN 1% LEAD
CONTENT; AND
(II) ANY FEDERALLY APPROVED NONTOXIC AMMUNITION.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Department
shall:
(i) Prescribe by regulation the means or weapons for hunting
designated wildlife; and
(ii) Set forth any restrictions relating to weapons used to hunt
designated wildlife, including the amount [and], size, AND TYPE of ammunition for
designated game birds or mammals.
(2) The Department may not prohibit a licensed bow hunter from openly
carrying a handgun that the hunter is otherwise authorized to carry under § 4–203 of the
Criminal Law Article if the bow hunter:
(i) Is at least 21 years old;
(ii) Is hunting in deer management Region A as defined by the
Department’s Guide to Hunting and Trapping;
(iii) Is carrying the handgun for personal protection; and
(iv) Does not use the handgun to kill wildlife wounded by a vertical
bow or crossbow.
(c) The Department shall make the regulations available for distribution with
each hunting license purchased.
(d) This section does not authorize the Department to restrict the use of firearms
except in the activity of hunting designated wildlife.
(E) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2029 2030, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REQUIRE THE USE OF
NONLEAD AMMUNITION FOR THE HUNTING OF ALL GAME SPECIES.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL AUTHORIZE THE USE OF LEAD
AMMUNITION FOR MUZZLELOADERS, HANDGUNS, RIFLES, AND SHOTGUNS IF

HOUSE BILL 1067
NONLEAD AMMUNITION IS NOT COMMERCIALLY AVAILABLE FOR THE SPECIFIC
FIREARM.
(3) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES REGULATIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT
REQUIRING THE USE OF NONLEAD AMMUNITION FOR HUNTING FOR A FIRST
OFFENSE IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL FINE NOT EXCEEDING $750.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
10–408.
(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, on or before July
1, 2030, the Department shall require the use of nonlead ammunition for the hunting of all
game species.
(2) The Department shall authorize the use of lead ammunition for
muzzleloaders, handguns, rifles, and shotguns if nonlead ammunition is not commercially
available for the specific firearm.
(3) [A person who violates regulations of the Department requiring the use
of nonlead ammunition for hunting for a first offense is subject to a civil fine not exceeding
$750.
(4)] The Department shall adopt regulations to carry out this subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before July 1, 2027, the Department of Natural Resources shall adopt
regulations requiring the use of nonlead ammunition for hunting pen–raised birds on
regulated shooting areas.
(b) On or before July 1, 2028, the Department of Natural Resources shall adopt
regulations requiring the use of nonlead ammunition for hunting:
(1) upland game birds;
(2) webless migratory game birds; and
(3) wild turkey.

HOUSE BILL 1067 5
(c) On or before July 1, 2029, the Department of Natural Resources shall adopt
regulations requiring nonlead ammunition for:
(1) muzzleloaders, handguns, rifles, and shotguns used for hunting deer;
and
(2) hunting any other game species not specified in this section.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect January 1, 2031.
SECTION 3. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.